en: Swords
xx: Swords
cs: Meče
da: Sværd
de: Fechtwaffen
es: Espadas
fr: Épées
it: Spade
ja: 刀剣
nl: Zwaarden
no: Sverd
pl: Miecze
pt: Espadas
ru: Мечи
sv: Svärd
tr: Kılıçlar

en: Throwing Stars
xx: Throwing Stars
cs: Vrhací hvězdice
da: Kastestjerner
de: Wurfsterne
es: Estrellas ninja
fr: Étoiles de ninja
it: Shuriken
ja: 手裏剣
nl: Werpsterren
no: Kastestjerner
pl: Gwiazdki do rzucania
pt: Estrelas de arremesso
ru: Метательные звездочки
sv: Kaststjärnor
tr: Ninja Yıldızları

en: Whips
xx: Whips
cs: Biče
da: Piske
de: Peitschen
es: Fustas y látigos
fr: Fouets et martinets
it: Fruste
ja: 鞭
nl: Zwepen
no: Pisker
pl: Baty
pt: Chicotes
ru: Плетки
sv: Piskor
tr: Kırbaçlar

en: Media
xx: Media
cs: Média
da: Medier
de: Medien
es: Multimedia
fr: Médias
it: Media
ja: メディア
nl: Media
no: Media
pl: Media
pt: Mídia
ru: Средства информации
sv: Media
tr: Medya

en: Books
xx: Books
ar: كتب
as: কিতাপ
az: Kitablar
be: Кнігі
bg: Книги
bn: বই
cs: Knihy
da: Bøger
de: Bücher
el: Βιβλία
es: Libros
et: Raamatud
fa: کتاب ها
fi: Kirjat
fr: Livres, Livre, Bande-dessinée (album)
ga: Leabhair
gu: પુસ્તકો
hi: पुस्तकें
hr: Knjige
hu: Könyvek
hy: Գրքեր
id: Buku
is: Bækur
it: Libri
ja: 書籍, 本
jw: Buku
ka: წიგნები
kk: Кітаптар
km: សៀវភៅ
kn: ಪುಸ್ತಕಗಳು
ko: 책
ky: Китептер
lt: Knygos
lv: Grāmatas
mk: Книги
ml: പുസ്തകങ്ങൾ
mn: Ном
mr: पुस्तके
ms: Buku
mt: Kotba
my: စာအုပ်များ
ne: किताबहरु
nl: Boeken
no: Bøker
or: ବହି
pa: ਕਿਤਾਬਾਂ
pl: Książki
pt: Livros
ro: Cărți
ru: Книги
sk: Knihy
sl: Knjige
sq: Libra
sr: Књиге
sv: Böcker
ta: புத்தகங்கள்
te: పుస్తకాలు
tg: Китобҳо
th: หนังสือ
tk: Kitaplar
tl: Mga libro
tr: Kitaplar
uk: Книги
ur: کتابیں
uz: Kitoblar
vi: Sách
zh: 书籍

en: Audiobooks
xx: Audiobooks
cs: Zvukové knihy
da: Lydbøger
de: Audiobücher
es: Audiolibros
fr: Livres audio
it: Audiolibri
ja: オーディオブック
nl: Audioboeken
no: Lydbøker
pl: Audiobooki
pt: Audiolivros
ru: Аудиокниги
sv: Ljudböcker
tr: Sesli Kitaplar

en: E-books
xx: E-books
cs: Elektronické knihy
da: E-bøger
de: E-Books
es: E-books
fr: E-books
it: E-book
ja: 電子書籍
nl: E-books
no: E-bøker
pl: E-booki
pt: E-books
ru: Книги в цифровом формате
sv: E-böcker
tr: E-kitaplar

en: Print Books
xx: Print Books
cs: Tištěné knihy
da: Trykte bøger
de: Gedruckte Bücher
es: Libros impresos
fr: Livres papier
it: Libri cartacei
ja: 印書・刊本
nl: Gedrukte boeken
no: Papirbøker
pl: Książki drukowane
pt: Livros impressos
ru: Печатные книги
sv: Tryckta böcker
tr: Basılı Kitaplar

en: Carpentry & Woodworking Project Plans
xx: Carpentry & Woodworking Project Plans
cs: Tesařské a truhlářské projektové plány
da: Projektvejledninger til snedker- og træarbejde
de: Baupläne für Tischler- und Holzarbeiten
es: Planos para proyectos de carpintería y madera
fr: Plans de charpenterie et de menuiserie
it: Piani per progetti di carpenteria e lavorazione del legno
ja: DIY図面、木工図面
nl: Bouwtekeningen voor timmerwerk en houtbewerking
no: Brukerveiledninger for snekring og trebearbeiding
pl: Instrukcje stolarskie „zrób to sam”
pt: Carpintaria e planos de projetos de marcenaria
ru: Столярные чертежи
sv: Snickeri och träslöjd
tr: Marangozculuk ve Ağaç İşçiliği Proje Planları

en: DVDs & Videos
xx: DVDs & Videos
cs: DVD a videa
da: Dvd'er og videoer
de: DVDs & Videos
es: DVD y vídeo
fr: DVD et vidéos, DVD
it: DVD e video
ja: DVD・ビデオ
nl: Dvd's en video's
no: DVD-er og videoer
pl: Filmy
pt: DVDs e vídeos
ru: DVD и видео
sv: DVD- och videofilmer
tr: DVD'ler ve Videolar

en: Film & Television DVDs, DVDs
xx: Film & Television DVDs
cs: Filmová a televizní DVD
da: DVD'er med film og tv
de: Film- & TV-DVDs
es: DVDs de cine y televisión
fr: DVD de films et séries
it: DVD di film e programmi televisivi
ja: 映画・テレビ番組のDVD
nl: Dvd's van films en series
no: DVD-er med filmer og TV-programmer
pl: Płyty DVD z filmami i programami telewizyjnymi
pt: DVDs de filmes e programas de TV
ru: Фильмы и телешоу на DVD
sv: DVD för film och tv
tr: Film ve Dizi DVD'leri

en: Film & Television Digital Downloads
xx: Film & Television Digital Downloads
cs: Filmy a televizní pořady k digitálnímu stažení
da: Digitale tv- og filmdownloads
de: Digitaler Download für Film & TV
es: Descargas digitales de cine y televisión
fr: Téléchargements numériques de films et séries
it: Download di film e programmi televisivi digitali
ja: 映画・テレビ番組のデジタルダウンロード
nl: Digitale downloads van films en series
no: Digitale film- og fjernsynsnedlastinger
pl: Pobrane pliki z filmami i programami telewizyjnymi
pt: Downloads digitais de filmes e programas de TV
ru: Скачиваемые фильмы и телешоу
sv: Digital film och tv för nedladdning
tr: İndirilebilir Dijital Filmler ve Diziler

en: Film & Television VHS Tapes, VHS
xx: Film & Television VHS Tapes
cs: Filmové a televizní videokazety
da: VHS-bånd med film og tv
de: Film- & TV-Videokassetten
es: Cintas VHS de cine y televisión
fr: VHS de films et séries, VHS
it: Videocassette di film e programmi televisivi
ja: 映画・テレビ番組のVHSテープ
nl: Videobanden van films en series
no: VHS-kassetter med filmer og TV-programmer
pl: Kasety VHS z filmami i programami telewizyjnymi
pt: Fitas VHS de filmes e programas de TV
ru: Фильмы и телешоу на видеокассетах
sv: VHS-band för film och tv
tr: Film ve Dizi VHS Kasetleri

en: Blu-Ray
xx: Blu-Ray
fr: Blu-ray

en: CD-ROMs
xx: CD-ROMs
fr: CD-ROM

en: Magazines & Newspapers
xx: Magazines & Newspapers
cs: Noviny a časopisy
da: Magasiner og aviser
de: Zeitschriften & Zeitungen
es: Revistas y periódicos
fr: Magazines et journaux
it: Riviste e giornali
ja: 新聞・雑誌
nl: Tijdschriften en kranten
no: Blader og aviser
pl: Gazety i czasopisma
pt: Revistas e jornais
ru: Журналы и газеты
sv: Tidningar och tidskrifter
tr: Dergiler ve Gazeteler

en: Magazines
xx: Magazines
cs: Časopisy
da: Magasiner
de: Zeitschriften
es: Revistas
fr: Magazines
it: Riviste
ja: 雑誌
nl: Tijdschriften
no: Tidsskrifter
pl: Czasopisma
pt: Revistas
ru: Журналы
sv: Tidskrifter
tr: Dergiler

en: Newspapers
xx: Newspapers
cs: Noviny
da: Aviser
de: Zeitungen
es: Periódicos
fr: Journaux
it: Giornali
ja: 新聞
nl: Kranten
no: Aviser
pl: Gazety
pt: Jornais
ru: Газеты
sv: Tidningar
tr: Gazeteler

en: Music & Sound Recordings
xx: Music & Sound Recordings
cs: Záznam hudby a zvuku
da: Musik- og lydoptagelser
de: Musik & Tonaufnahmen
es: Música y grabaciones
fr: Musique et enregistrements audio
it: Registrazioni di musica e suoni
ja: 音楽メディア
nl: Muziek- en geluidsopnamen
no: Musikk- og lydopptak
pl: Nagrania muzyczne i dźwiękowe
pt: Gravações de músicas
ru: Музыкальные товары и звукозаписи
sv: Musik- och ljudinspelning
tr: Müzik ve Ses Kayıt Cihazları

en: Digital Music Downloads
xx: Digital Music Downloads
cs: Hudba k digitálnímu stažení
da: Digitale musikdownloads
de: Digitale Musikdownloads
es: Descargas de música digital
fr: Téléchargements de musique numérique
it: Download di musica digitale
ja: デジタル音楽ダウンロード
nl: Digitale muziekdownloads
no: Digitale musikknedlastinger
pl: Pobrane pliki cyfrowe z muzyką
pt: Downloads de música digital
ru: Скачиваемая музыка
sv: Digital musik för nedladdning
tr: İndirilebilir Dijital Müzikler